Maine, session 132, LD1314.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 9-A MRSA §8-512 is enacted to read:
§8-512. Discrimination prohibited against persons employed in cannabis
establishments or as registered caregivers
1. Definitions. For the purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise indicates,
the following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Cannabis establishment" has the same meaning as in Title 28-B, section 102-A,
subsection 10.
B. "Registered caregiver" has the same meaning as in Title 22, section 2421-A,
subsection 40.
2. Discrimination prohibited. Except when prohibited by federal law and regulation,
a creditor may not deny an application for, refuse to extend credit for or cancel a credit card
solely on the basis that a person is an owner, operator or employee of a cannabis
establishment authorized under Title 28-B, chapter 1 or is a registered caregiver under Title
22, chapter 558-C. This subsection does not prohibit a creditor from denying, refusing to
extend credit for or cancelling a credit card on the basis of any other applicable factor
related to a person's creditworthiness.
3. Use of personal information. With respect to information that may be provided in
connection with a credit card application, a creditor may not disclose any information
related to a person's ownership or operation of or employment by a cannabis establishment
or a person's conduct as a registered caregiver without the person's consent.
4. Enforcement. A person aggrieved by a violation of this section may:
A. File a complaint with the administrator; or
B. Bring an action in either Superior Court or District Court for equitable relief,
including an injunction.